Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2537.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-861, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-861. Agency and community college district governing board responsibilities; definitions A. The chief administrator of each state agency or district board is responsible for the preservation of historic properties which that are owned or controlled by the agency or district. Prior to Before acquiring, constructing or leasing buildings for purposes of carrying out agency or district responsibilities, each agency or district shall consider the use of historic properties available to the agency or district. Each agency or district shall undertake any preservation that is necessary to carry out this article in a manner consistent with the preservation of historic properties, the duties of the agency or district and the professional standards which that the state historic preservation officer recommends.  The chief administrator of a state agency or district board may designate a full-time employee to coordinate the agency's or district's activities under this article. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "District" has the same meaning prescribed in section 15-1401. 2. "District board" has the same meaning prescribed in section 15-1401. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 41-862, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-862. Program; definition A. In cooperation with the state historic preservation officer, each state agency or district shall establish a program to locate, inventory and nominate to the Arizona register of historic places all properties that are under the agency's or the district's ownership or control and that appear to meet the criteria for inclusion on the register.  Each state agency or district shall exercise caution to assure ensure that the property is not inadvertently transferred, sold, demolished, substantially altered or allowed to deteriorate significantly.  The state historic preservation officer shall include the performance of state agencies and districts in initiating and satisfying the programmatic management of historic properties in the annual report to the legislature and the governor as provided in section 41-151.20. B. For the purposes of this section, "district" has the same meaning prescribed in section 15-1401. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 41-864, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-864. Review of agency and community college district plans; definition A. The state historic preservation officer has thirty working days in which to review and comment on any plans of a state agency which or a district that involve property which that is included on or may qualify for inclusion on the Arizona register of historic places, including any construction project, sale, lease or acquisition of historic properties, to ensure that the prehistorical, historical, architectural or culturally significant values will be preserved or enhanced. B. For the purposes of this section, "district" has the same meaning prescribed in section 15-1401. END_STATUTE